Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 3. Actions to Set Aside or Contest

Weight of California decisions. —

This part of the Wyoming Probate Code having to do with contests was taken from California, and this state has been inclined to follow decisions in that state on this subject. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963). See also notes to §

2-1-102

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status: inheritability or descendability of right to contest will, 11 ALR4th 907.

Sufficiency of evidence to support grant of summary judgment in will probate or contest proceedings, 53 ALR4th 561.

Estoppel to contest will or attack its validity by acceptance of benefits thereunder, 78 ALR4th 90.

§ 2-6-301.
Filing and contents of petition to revoke.

After a will has been admitted to probate, any person interested may, within the time designated in the notice provided for in W.S.

2-6-122

or

2-7-201

, contest the will or the validity of the will. For that purpose he shall file in the court in which the will was proved a petition in writing containing his allegations against the validity of the will or against the sufficiency of the proof, and praying that the probate be revoked.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 3, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 4607; C.S. 1910, § 5445; C.S. 1920, § 6817; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 120; R.S. 1931, § 88-701; Laws 1945, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-408; W.S. 1957, § 2-83; Laws 1971, ch. 82, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-320; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provision that probate shall be conclusive after three months, see §

2-6-306

.

Applicability. —

Son adopted the neighbors'
allegations as his own and there was no question that the son's filing complied with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

2-6-301

' s requirements that he file a petition in writing containing his allegations against the validity of the will or against the sufficiency of the proof, and praying that the probate be revoked; the son timely filed an objection to the probate and it should have been treated as such.
Russell v. Sullivan, 2012 WY 20, 270 P.3d 677,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2012).

Proceedings for disproving or contesting a will were unknown to the common law.

Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Rather, right of contest is a creature of statute,

and a contestant has such rights and only such rights as the law gives him. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Proceeding under section is not a civil action

but a proceeding provided for in the Probate Code. Merrill v. District Court, 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1954); Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963). But see §§

2-2-308

and

2-6-302

.

Term “the court in which the will was proved,”

within the meaning of this section, means the court of the jurisdiction within which the will was proved, that is, the probate arm of the district court. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

The reference in this section to “the court in which the will was proved” was not intended by the legislature to have a broad and inclusive meaning as if there were one district court in a given judicial district for several counties, and as if there were one district court in a given county for several jurisdictions such as civil, criminal and probate. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Within the meaning of this section, the term “the court in which the will was proved” means the court of the county in which the will was proved. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Matters exclusively within jurisdiction of probate court. —

A court having equitable powers cannot set aside an order admitting a will to probate, since the probate of a will is a matter exclusively within the jurisdiction of the probate court. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

How jurisdiction obtained. —

Under this section, jurisdiction of the subject matter by the court is acquired in the filing of the petition for revocation of probate. Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

When the court obtains jurisdiction of the subject matter, it does not thereby obtain jurisdiction of the parties until issuance and service of the citation provided for by §

2-6-302

.Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

Wills must be contested within time limit. —

Prompt and immediate administration of estates is a matter of special public policy clearly manifest in the statutes of this state and by the very fact that wills must be contested under this section within a limited time, which has been reduced by the legislature. Hartt v. Brimmer, 74 Wyo. 356, 287 P.2d 645,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1955).

Even though probate ex parte and without notice to heirs. —

This section and §§

2-6-303

and

2-6-306

on their face relate only to contest of a will or the validity thereof, and an action thereunder would be barred after six (now three) months from admission of will to probate even though probate was ex parte and without notice to heirs. Hartt v. Brimmer, 74 Wyo. 356, 287 P.2d 645,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1955).

Attack on order of probate for defect in procedure distinguished.—

An attack on an order of probate because of a defect in procedure, while related, is distinct from a contest of a will in which, though incidentally seeking to set the order of probate aside, the will itself, or the validity thereof, is attacked. Hartt v. Brimmer, 74 Wyo. 356, 287 P.2d 645,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1955).

No-contest or in terrorem clause enforced despite contestant'sgood faith and probable cause. —

The district court does not err in enforcing the terms of a will's no-contest or in terrorem clause without first considering whether the contestant contested the will in good faith and with probable cause to believe the will was invalid. Dainton v. Watson, 658 P.2d 79,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

Kortz v. American Nat'l Bank, 571 P.2d 985,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1905); In re Lane's Estate, 50 Wyo. 119, 58 P.2d 415,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1936); Burns v. Burns, 67 Wyo. 314, 224 P.2d 178,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1950); In re Estate of Wilson, 397 P.2d 805,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1964); In re Estate of Morton, 428 P.2d 725,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1967); Taylor v. Estate of Taylor, 719 P.2d 234,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1986); Gaston v. Wagner (In re Estate of Meeker), 2017 WY 75, 397 P.3d 183,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For note on limitation period for contesting probate of wills, see 1 Wyo. L.J. 131.

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See note, “Probate Procedure — Distinctions Between the Probate and Civil Arms of the District Courts,” 19 Wyo. L.J. 241 (1965).

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Challenge in collateral proceeding to decree admitting will to probate, on ground of fraud inducing complainant not to resist probate, 84 ALR3d 1119.

Validity and enforceability of provision of will or trust instrument for forfeiture or reduction of share of contesting beneficiary, 23 ALR4th 369.

Adopted child as subject to protection of statute regarding rights of children pretermitted by will, or statute preventing disinheritance of child, 43 ALR4th 947.

Fraud as extending statutory limitations period for contesting will or its probate, 48 ALR4th 1094.

What constitutes contest or attempt to defeat will within provision thereof forfeiting share of contesting beneficiary, 3 ALR5th 590.

Action for tortious interference with bequest as precluded by will contest remedy, 18 ALR5th 211.

§ 2-6-302.
Summons and notification; proceedings governed by civil rules.

Upon filing the petition, a summons shall be served upon the executors of the will and the clerk shall send notice by certified mail, with copy of petition attached, to all the legatees and devisees mentioned in the will and all the heirs, so far as known to the petitioner, or to their guardians if any of them are minors, or to their personal representatives if any of them are dead. The summons, service and proceedings shall be governed by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 3, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 4608; C.S. 1910, § 5446; C.S. 1920, § 6718; R.S. 1931, § 88-702; C.S. 1945, § 6-409; W.S. 1957, § 2-84; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-321; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the provisions of the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Editor's notes. —

The following cases were decided prior to the 1980 revision of title 2 and this section when summons, etc., were made governable by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, which may affect their holdings in this regard.

Court may dismiss proceeding where citation not issued within time contemplated. —

If citation is not issued within the time contemplated, the court has inherent power to dismiss the proceeding for want of prosecution. Merrill v. District Court, 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1954). See §

2-6-301

as to time for contest.

But issuance within definite period not jurisdictional. —

This section does not fix a definite time in which the citation must be issued and served, and has not made the issuance of a citation within six (now three) months after probate of the will jurisdictional. Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

Hence, the rule of reasonable time would ordinarily be applicable.

Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

And court may in its discretion relieve party from default. —

While ordinarily the citation mentioned in this section should be issued within six (now three) months after a will has been admitted to probate, in view of the fact that the section does not fix a definite time, the court has power and judicial discretion to relieve a party seeking to revoke a will of the default in doing so, provided that no harm is done by the delay, and provided that relief from the default is justifiable and is asked of the court within a reasonable time. Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

Where delay in issuing citation required by this section did not exceed 16 days after expiration of the six (now three) month period from probate of will, discretion of the court in relieving party of default in doing so did not appear on facts in the case to have been abused. Merrill v. District Court of Fifth Judicial Dist., 73 Wyo. 58, 272 P.2d 597,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1954).

Cited in

Gaston v. Wagner (In re Estate of Meeker), 2017 WY 75, 397 P.3d 183,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2017).

Applied

in

Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

§ 2-6-303.
Annulment and revocation.

If upon trial, the jury, or if no jury, the court decides the will is invalid or that it is not sufficiently proved to be the last will of the testator, the probate shall be annulled and revoked.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 3, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4610; C.S. 1910, § 5448; C.S. 1920, § 6720; Laws 1921, ch. 28, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 88-704; C.S. 1945, § 6-411; W.S. 1957, § 2-86; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-323; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trial by jury generally, see Rule 38, W.R.C.P. et seq.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

Cited

in

Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(1905); Hartt v. Brimmer, 74 Wyo. 356, 287 P.2d 645,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(1955).

§ 2-6-304.
Cessation of executor's powers; immunity.

Upon the revocation being made, the powers of the executor cease, but the executor is not liable for any act done in good faith previous to the revocation.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 3, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 4611; C.S. 1910, § 5449; C.S. 1920, § 6721; R.S. 1931, § 88-705; C.S. 1945, § 6-412; W.S. 1957, § 2-87; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-324; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Administrator entitled to credit for disbursements and commissions.—

An administrator acting in good faith under a voidable order of appointment is entitled to credit for reasonable disbursements and commissions. Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

§ 2-6-305.
Liability for payment of contest costs.

The fees and expenses shall be paid by the party contesting the validity or probate of the will if the will in probate is affirmed. If the probate is revoked, the costs shall be paid by the party who resisted the revocation, or out of the property of the decedent, as the court directs.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 3, § 11; R.S. 1899, § 4612; C.S. 1910, § 5450; C.S. 1920, § 6722; R.S. 1931, § 88-706; C.S. 1945, § 6-413; W.S. 1957, § 2-88; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-325; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Section applies to any contest,

whether based upon the authority of §

2-6-301

or not and whether before or after the will is admitted. In re Estate of Wilson, 397 P.2d 805,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1964), rehearing denied, 399 P.2d 1008,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1965) (decided prior to 1980 revision of title 2).

Attorney's fees not recoverable. —

An award of attorney's fees to the personal representative and a beneficiary, who prevailed in a will contest, was not authorized by this section. In re Estate of Croft, 734 P.2d 59,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 412

(Wyo. 1987).

Applied

in

In re Estate of Wilson, 399 P.2d 1008,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1965).

§ 2-6-306.
When probate deemed conclusive.

If no person within the time designated in the notice provided for in W.S.

2-6-122

or

2-7-201

files a petition to contest the will or its validity, the probate of the will is conclusive.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 3, § 12; R.S. 1899, § 4613; C.S. 1910, § 5451; C.S. 1920, § 6723; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 121; R.S. 1931, § 88-707; Laws 1945, ch. 52, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 6-414; W.S. 1957, § 2-89; Laws 1971, ch. 80, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 2-4-326; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1981, ch. 151, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to time that probate should be contested, see §

2-6-301

.

Legislative intent. —

Prompt and immediate administration of estates is matter of special public policy clearly manifest in statutes of this state and by the very fact that wills must be contested under this section within a limited time, which has been reduced by the legislature. Hartt v. Brimmer, 74 Wyo. 356, 287 P.2d 645,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1955).

Applicability. —

Argument that this section does not apply where purported defects in a will are observable only upon actual examination of the will which is filed for probate is without merit, and is in direct contradiction to the plain and unambiguous language of this section. Kortz v. American Nat'l Bank, 571 P.2d 985,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1977).

Stated

in

Burns v. Burns, 67 Wyo. 314, 224 P.2d 178,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1950).

Cited

in

Taylor v. Estate of Taylor, 719 P.2d 234,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

See “Legislation,” 1 Wyo. L.J. 126.